District of Columbia statutes.
16-550

Preservation of property; sale.

The court may make all orders necessary for the preservation of the property attached. When the property is perishable, or for other reasons a sale of it appears expedient, the court may order that the property be sold and its proceeds paid into court and held subject to its order on the final decision of the case.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-550.
1973 Ed., § 16-550.